Utah statutes.
73-1-19.   State, agency, county, city or town -- Authority of -- To procure stock of irrigation or pipeline company -- To bring its land within conservation or conservancy district.

The state of Utah, or any department, board or agency thereof, and any county, city, or town, owning or having control of land or improvements thereon which is in need of a supply of water for such land or the improvements thereon, or in need of facilities for conveyance of such water, is authorized to subscribe for or purchase corporate stock of irrigation companies, pipeline companies, or associations and take the necessary steps to bring the land owned or controlled by any of them within any conservation or conservancy district formed or to be formed under the laws of the state of Utah to procure such supply of water to all intents and purposes as if an individual.



No Change Since 1953

